Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-168
Banks; special reports to department.

Any bank shall be required to furnish such special reports as may be required by the department to enable such department to obtain full and complete knowledge of the condition of such bank.

Laws 1909, c. 10, § 19, p. 76;

R.S.1913, § 298;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XVI, § 19, p. 693;

C.S.1922, § 8000;

C.S.1929, § 8-131;

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 21, p. 145;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-131;

R.S.1943, § 8-133;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 68, p. 161.